Maryland, session 2026, HB1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–2A–01.

HOUSE BILL 1209
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the
context of their use requires otherwise.
(b) “Arbitration panel” means the arbitrators selected to determine a health care
malpractice claim in accordance with this subtitle.
(c) (1) “CONVERSION THERAPY” MEANS A PRACTICE OR TREATMENT BY
A MENTAL HEALTH OR CHILD CARE PRACTITIONER THAT SEEKS TO CHANGE AN
INDIVIDUAL’S SEXUAL ORIENTATION OR GENDER IDENTITY.
(2) “CONVERSION THERAPY” INCLUDES ANY EFFORT TO CHANGE THE
BEHAVIORAL EXPRESSION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S SEXUAL ORIENTATION, CHANGE
GENDER EXPRESSION, OR ELIMINATE OR REDUCE SEXUAL OR ROMANTIC
ATTRACTIONS OR FEELINGS TOWARD INDIVIDUALS OF THE SAME GENDER.
(3) “CONVERSION THERAPY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PRACTICE BY A
MENTAL HEALTH OR CHILD CARE PRACTITIONER THAT:
(I) PROVIDES ACCEPTANCE, SUPPORT, AND UNDERSTANDING,
OR THE FACILITATION OF COPING, SOCIAL SUPPORT, AND IDENTITY EXPLORATION
AND DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING SEXUAL ORIENTATION–NEUTRAL INTERVENTIONS
TO PREVENT OR ADDRESS UNLAWFUL CONDUCT OR UNSAFE SEXUAL PRACTICES;
AND
(II) DOES NOT SEEK TO CHANGE SEXUAL ORIENTATION OR
GENDER IDENTITY.
(D) “Court” means a circuit court for a county.
[(d)] (E) “Director” means the Director of the Health Care Alternative Dispute
Resolution Office.
[(e)] (F) “Economic damages” retains its judicially determined meaning.
[(f)] (G) (1) “Health care provider” means a hospital, a related institution as
defined in § 19–301 of the Health – General Article, a medical day care center, a hospice
care program, an assisted living program, a freestanding ambulatory care facility as
defined in § 19–3B–01 of the Health – General Article, a physician, a physician assistant,
an osteopath, an optometrist, a chiropractor, a registered or licensed practical nurse, a
dentist, a podiatrist, a psychologist, a licensed certified social worker–clinical, and a
physical therapist, licensed or authorized to provide one or more health care services in
Maryland.

HOUSE BILL 1209 5
(2) “Health care provider” does not include any nursing institution
conducted by and for those who rely upon treatment by spiritual means through prayer
alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious
denomination.
[(g)] (H) (1) “Medical injury” means injury arising or resulting from the
rendering or failure to render health care.
(2) “MEDICAL INJURY” INCLUDES PSYCHOLOGICAL INJURY
ARISING OR RESULTING FROM CONVERSION THERAPY PROVIDED IN THE STATE.
[(h)] (I) “Noneconomic damages” means:
(1) In a claim for personal injury, pain, suffering, inconvenience, physical
impairment, disfigurement, loss of consortium, or other nonpecuniary injury; or
(2) In a claim for wrongful death, mental anguish, emotional pain and
suffering, loss of society, companionship, comfort, protection, care, marital care, parental
care, filial care, attention, advice, counsel, training, guidance, or education, or other
noneconomic damages authorized under Subtitle 9 of this title.
3–2A–02.
(a) (1) All claims, suits, and actions, including cross claims, third–party
claims, and actions under Subtitle 9 of this title, by a person against a health care provider
for medical injury allegedly suffered by the person in which damages of more than the limit
of the concurrent jurisdiction of the District Court are sought are subject to and shall be
governed by the provisions of this subtitle.
(2) An action or suit of that type may not be brought or pursued in any
court of this State except in accordance with this subtitle.
(3) Except for the procedures stated in § 3–2A–06(f) of this subtitle, an
action within the concurrent jurisdiction of the District Court is not subject to the
provisions of this subtitle.
(b) A claim filed under this subtitle and an initial pleading filed in any subsequent
action may not contain a statement of the amount of damages sought other than that they
are more than a required jurisdictional amount.
(c) (1) In any action for damages filed under this subtitle, the health care
provider is not liable for the payment of damages unless it is established that the care given
by the health care provider is not in accordance with the standards of practice among
members of the same health care profession with similar training and experience situated
in the same or similar communities at the time of the alleged act giving rise to the cause of
action.

HOUSE BILL 1209
(2) (i) This paragraph applies to a claim or action filed on or after
January 1, 2005.
(ii) 1. [In] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 3
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, IN addition to any other qualifications, a health care provider
who attests in a certificate of a qualified expert or testifies in relation to a proceeding before
a panel or court concerning a defendant’s compliance with or departure from standards of
care:
A. Shall have had clinical experience, provided consultation
relating to clinical practice, or taught medicine in the defendant’s specialty or a related
field of health care, or in the field of health care in which the defendant provided care or
treatment to the plaintiff, within 5 years of the date of the alleged act or omission giving
rise to the cause of action; and
B. Except as provided in [subsubparagraph 2]
SUBSUBPARAGRAPHS 2 AND 3 of this subparagraph, if the defendant is board certified in
a specialty, shall be board certified in the same or a related specialty as the defendant.
2. Subsubparagraph 1B of this subparagraph does not apply
if:
A. The defendant was providing care or treatment to the
plaintiff unrelated to the area in which the defendant is board certified; or
B. The health care provider taught medicine in the
defendant’s specialty or a related field of health care.
3. IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER QUALIFICATIONS, IN AN
ACTION FOR DAMAGES RELATING TO CONVERSION THERAPY UNDER § 3–2A–02.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER WHO ATTESTS IN A CERTIFICATE OF A
QUALIFIED EXPERT, OR TESTIFIES IN RELATION TO A PROCEEDING BEFORE A PANEL
OR COURT CONCERNING A DEFENDANT’S COMPLIANCE WITH OR DEPARTURE FROM
STANDARDS OF CARE, MAY BE ANY LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH PROVIDER OR
RESEARCHER WITH EXPERTISE IN THE PSYCHOLOGICAL EFFECTS OF CONVERSION
THERAPY.
(d) Except as otherwise provided, the Maryland Rules shall apply to all practice
and procedure issues arising under this subtitle.
3–2A–02.1.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY FILE AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES FOR INJURY
CAUSED BY THE PROVISION OF CONVERSION THERAPY TO THE INDIVIDUAL
AGAINST:

HOUSE BILL 1209 7
(1) THE LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER WHO PROVIDED THE
CONVERSION THERAPY;
(2) A PERSON THAT EMPLOYED, SUPERVISED, OR OTHERWISE
EXERCISED AUTHORITY OVER THE LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER WHO
PROVIDED THE CONVERSION THERAPY IF THE PERSON:
(I) KNEW OR HAD REASON TO KNOW THAT THE LICENSED
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER PROVIDED CONVERSION THERAPY; AND
(II) FAILED TO TAKE REASONABLE STEPS TO PREVENT THE
LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER FROM PROVIDING CONVERSION THERAPY; OR
(3) A PERSON THAT NEGLIGENTLY HIRED, SUPERVISED, OR
RETAINED THE LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER WHO PROVIDED THE
CONVERSION THERAPY.
(B) (1) IN AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES FOR MEDICAL INJURY AS A RESULT
OF CONVERSION THERAPY, A PLAINTIFF MAY SEEK:
(I) ECONOMIC DAMAGES;
(II) NONECONOMIC DAMAGES;
(III) PUNITIVE DAMAGES; AND
(IV) ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COURT COSTS.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING § 11–108 OF THIS ARTICLE, THERE IS NO
LIMITATION ON THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF NONECONOMIC DAMAGES THAT MAY BE
AWARDED TO A SINGLE CLAIMANT IN AN ACTION AGAINST A SINGLE DEFENDANT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION FOR DAMAGES FOR MEDICAL
INJURY CAUSED BY THE PROVISION OF CONVERSION THERAPY, THE PLAINTIFF HAS
THE BURDEN OF PROOF TO DEMONSTRATE THROUGH EXPERT TESTIMONY,
SCIENTIFIC LITERATURE, AND OTHER EVIDENCE, THAT CONVERSION THERAPY IS
CAPABLE OF CAUSING THE MEDICAL INJURY SUFFERED BY THE PLAINTIFF.
(2) IF A PLAINTIFF MEETS THE BURDEN OF PROOF UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEFENDANT HAS THE BURDEN OF PROOF
TO SHOW BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT THE PLAINTIFF’S MEDICAL

HOUSE BILL 1209
INJURY IS SOLELY A RESULT OF OTHER FACTORS UNRELATED TO THE CONVERSION
THERAPY.
SUBTITLE 27. LIABILITY FOR PROVISION OF CONVERSION THERAPY.
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “CONVERSION THERAPY” MEANS A PRACTICE OR TREATMENT
THAT SEEKS TO CHANGE AN INDIVIDUAL’S SEXUAL ORIENTATION OR GENDER
IDENTITY.
(2) “CONVERSION THERAPY” INCLUDES ANY EFFORT TO CHANGE THE
BEHAVIORAL EXPRESSION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S SEXUAL ORIENTATION, CHANGE
GENDER EXPRESSION, OR ELIMINATE OR REDUCE SEXUAL OR ROMANTIC
ATTRACTIONS OR FEELINGS TOWARD INDIVIDUALS OF THE SAME GENDER.
(C) “MENTAL HEALTH OR CHILD CARE PRACTITIONER” MEANS:
(1) A PRACTITIONER LICENSED OR CERTIFIED UNDER TITLE 14, 17,
18, 19, OR 20 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
(2) ANY OTHER PRACTITIONER LICENSED OR CERTIFIED UNDER THE
HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE COUNSELING BY
THE PRACTITIONER’S LICENSING OR CERTIFYING BOARD.
(D) “PERSON” INCLUDES A NONPROFIT ENTITY.
3–2702.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A MENTAL HEALTH OR CHILD CARE
PRACTITIONER.
3–2703.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES FOR INJURY
CAUSED BY THE PROVISION OF CONVERSION THERAPY TO THE INDIVIDUAL IN
VIOLATION OF § 3–1303(A)(1) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE AGAINST:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDED THE CONVERSION THERAPY;

HOUSE BILL 1209 9
(2) A PERSON THAT EMPLOYED, SUPERVISED, OR OTHERWISE
EXERCISED AUTHORITY OVER THE INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDED THE CONVERSION
THERAPY IF THE PERSON:
(I) KNEW OR HAD REASON TO KNOW THAT CONVERSION
THERAPY WAS PROVIDED; AND
(II) FAILED TO TAKE REASONABLE STEPS TO PREVENT THE
PROVISION OF CONVERSION THERAPY; OR
(3) A PERSON THAT NEGLIGENTLY HIRED, SUPERVISED, OR
RETAINED THE INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDED THE CONVERSION THERAPY.
(B) IN AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES FOR INJURY CAUSED BY THE PROVISION
OF CONVERSION THERAPY, A PLAINTIFF MAY SEEK:
(1) ECONOMIC DAMAGES;
(2) NONECONOMIC DAMAGES;
(3) PUNITIVE DAMAGES; AND
(4) ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COURT COSTS.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING § 11–108 OF THIS ARTICLE, THERE IS NO
LIMITATION ON THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF NONECONOMIC DAMAGES THAT MAY BE
AWARDED TO A SINGLE CLAIMANT IN AN ACTION AGAINST A SINGLE DEFENDANT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION FOR DAMAGES FOR INJURY
CAUSED BY THE PROVISION OF CONVERSION THERAPY, THE PLAINTIFF HAS THE
BURDEN OF PROOF TO DEMONSTRATE THROUGH EXPERT TESTIMONY, SCIENTIFIC
LITERATURE, AND OTHER EVIDENCE, THAT CONVERSION THERAPY IS CAPABLE OF
CAUSING THE MEDICAL INJURY SUFFERED BY THE PLAINTIFF.
(2) IF A PLAINTIFF MEETS THE BURDEN OF PROOF UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEFENDANT HAS THE BURDEN OF PROOF
TO SHOW BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT THE PLAINTIFF’S INJURY
IS SOLELY A RESULT OF OTHER FACTORS UNRELATED TO THE CONVERSION
THERAPY.
3–2704.

HOUSE BILL 1209
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING A TIME LIMITATION UNDER A STATUTE OF
LIMITATIONS, STATUTE OF REPOSE, OR ANY OTHER LAW, AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR INJURY CAUSED BY THE PROVISION OF CONVERSION
THERAPY THAT OCCURRED WHILE THE PLAINTIFF WAS A MINOR MAY BE FILED AT
ANY TIME.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY TIME LIMITATION UNDER THIS SECTION OR
ANY OTHER STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS, STATUTE OF REPOSE, OR ANY OTHER LAW,
AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES FOR MEDICAL INJURY DUE TO CONVERSION THERAPY
THAT OCCURRED WHILE THE PLAINTIFF WAS AN ADULT SHALL BE FILED WITHIN 20
YEARS AFTER THE PLAINTIFF’S LAST CONVERSION THERAPY SESSION.
(C) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE DATE AN INJURY WAS
DISCOVERED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IN AN ACTION FOR
DAMAGES FOR MEDICAL INJURY RESULTING FROM CONVERSION THERAPY UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE, A CLAIMANT DISCOVERS THE INJURY WHEN THE CLAIMANT FIRST
KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE PSYCHOLOGICAL INJURY
WAS CAUSED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY THE CONVERSION THERAPY.
(2) IT IS NOT SUFFICIENT TO DEMONSTRATE THAT A CLAIMANT KNEW
ABOUT THE PSYCHOLOGICAL INJURY WITHOUT ALSO DEMONSTRATING THAT THE
CLAIMANT KNEW OR HAD REASON TO KNOW THAT THE PSYCHOLOGICAL INJURY WAS
CAUSED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY THE CONVERSION THERAPY.
5–109.
(a) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, AN
action for damages for an injury arising out of the rendering of or failure to render
professional services by a health care provider, as defined in § 3–2A–01 of this article, shall
be filed within the earlier of:
(1) Five years of the time the injury was committed; or
(2) Three years of the date the injury was discovered.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, if the claimant was under
the age of 11 years at the time the injury was committed, the time limitations prescribed
in subsection (a) of this section shall commence when the claimant reaches the age of 11
years.
(c) (1) The provisions of subsection (b) of this section may not be applied to an
action for damages for an injury:
(i) To the reproductive system of the claimant; or

HOUSE BILL 1209 11
(ii) Caused by a foreign object negligently left in the claimant’s body.
(2) In an action for damages for an injury described in this subsection, if
the claimant was under the age of 16 years at the time the injury was committed, the time
limitations prescribed in subsection (a) of this section shall commence when the claimant
reaches the age of 16 years.
(d) For the purposes of this section, the filing of a claim with the Health Care
Alternative Dispute Resolution Office in accordance with § 3–2A–04 of this article shall be
deemed the filing of an action.
(e) The provisions of § 5–201 of this title that relate to a cause of action of a minor
may not be construed as limiting the application of subsection (b) or (c) of this section.
(f) Nothing contained in this section may be construed as limiting the application
of the provisions of:
(1) § 5–201 of this title that relate to a cause of action of a mental
incompetent; or
(2) § 5–203 of this title.
(G) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING A TIME LIMITATION UNDER THIS SECTION OR
ANY OTHER TIME LIMITATION UNDER A STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS, STATUTE OR
REPOSE, OR ANY OTHER LAW, AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES FOR MEDICAL INJURY
CAUSED BY THE PROVISION OF CONVERSION THERAPY UNDER § 3–2A–02.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE MAY BE FILED:
(I) IF THE CONVERSION THERAPY OCCURRED WHILE THE
PLAINTIFF WAS A MINOR, AT ANY TIME; AND
(II) IF THE CONVERSION THERAPY OCCURRED WHILE THE
PLAINTIFF WAS AN ADULT, WITHIN 20 YEARS AFTER THE PLAINTIFF’S LAST
CONVERSION THERAPY SESSION.
(2) (I) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE DATE AN INJURY WAS
DISCOVERED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IN AN ACTION FOR
DAMAGES FOR MEDICAL INJURY CAUSED BY THE PROVISION OF CONVERSION
THERAPY, A CLAIMANT DISCOVERS THE INJURY WHEN THE CLAIMANT FIRST KNEW
OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE PSYCHOLOGICAL INJURY WAS
CAUSED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY THE CONVERSION THERAPY.
(II) IT IS NOT SUFFICIENT TO DEMONSTRATE THAT A CLAIMANT
KNEW ABOUT THE PSYCHOLOGICAL INJURY WITHOUT ALSO DEMONSTRATING THAT

HOUSE BILL 1209
THE CLAIMANT KNEW OR HAD REASON TO KNOW THAT THE PSYCHOLOGICAL INJURY
WAS CAUSED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY THE CONVERSION THERAPY.
Article – Criminal Law
SUBTITLE 13. CONVERSION THERAPY.
3–1301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “CONVERSION THERAPY” MEANS A PRACTICE OR TREATMENT
THAT SEEKS TO CHANGE AN INDIVIDUAL’S SEXUAL ORIENTATION OR GENDER
IDENTITY.
(2) “CONVERSION THERAPY” INCLUDES ANY EFFORT TO CHANGE THE
BEHAVIORAL EXPRESSION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S SEXUAL ORIENTATION, CHANGE
GENDER EXPRESSION, OR ELIMINATE OR REDUCE SEXUAL OR ROMANTIC
ATTRACTIONS OR FEELINGS TOWARD INDIVIDUALS OF THE SAME GENDER.
(C) “MENTAL HEALTH OR CHILD CARE PRACTITIONER” MEANS:
(1) A PRACTITIONER LICENSED OR CERTIFIED UNDER TITLE 14, 17,
18, 19, OR 20 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
(2) ANY OTHER PRACTITIONER LICENSED OR CERTIFIED UNDER THE
HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE COUNSELING BY
THE PRACTITIONER’S LICENSING OR CERTIFYING BOARD.
(D) “PERSON” INCLUDES A NONPROFIT ENTITY.
3–1302.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A MENTAL HEALTH OR CHILD CARE
PRACTITIONER.
3–1303.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) FOR COMPENSATION, PROVIDE CONVERSION THERAPY; OR

HOUSE BILL 1209 13
(2) FOR PROFESSIONAL, COMMERCIAL, OR MONETARY GAIN,
ADVERTISE, PUBLISH, DISPLAY, BROADCAST, SOLICIT, REPRESENT, OR MAKE ANY
FALSE, MISLEADING, OR DECEPTIVE STATEMENT RELATING TO THE PROVISION OF
CONVERSION THERAPY, INCLUDING CLAIMS REGARDING THE EFFICACY OF
CONVERSION THERAPY IN ALTERING THE SEXUAL ORIENTATION OR GENDER
IDENTITY OF AN INDIVIDUAL.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $50,000 OR BOTH.
Article – Insurance
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Insurance Administration.
19–117.
(a) (1) In this section[, “adverse] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) (I) “ADVERSE action” includes:
[(i)] 1. refusing to renew or execute a contract or agreement with
a health care practitioner;
[(ii)] 2. making a report or commenting to an appropriate private
or governmental entity regarding practices of legally protected health care as defined in §
2–312 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article; and
[(iii)] 3. increasing a premium for or making another type of
unfavorable change regarding terms of coverage under a medical professional liability
insurance contract agreement with a health care practitioner.
[(2)] (II) “Adverse action” does not include making a rate filing in
accordance with § 11–206 of this article.
(3) “LEGALLY PROTECTED HEALTH CARE” DOES NOT INCLUDE
CONVERSION THERAPY, AS DEFINED IN § 1–212.1 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1209
(b) An insurer that issues to, delivers to, or renews medical professional liability
insurance for a health care practitioner licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by law
to practice in the State may not take adverse action against a health care practitioner in
whole or in part because the health care practitioner provides legally protected health care
or makes a referral for legally protected health care.
(c) This section does not prohibit the medical professional liability insurer from
taking adverse action against a health care practitioner for conduct that would otherwise
constitute professional misconduct.
19–118.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “CONVERSION THERAPY” MEANS A PRACTICE
OR TREATMENT BY A MENTAL HEALTH OR CHILD CARE PRACTITIONER THAT SEEKS
TO CHANGE AN INDIVIDUAL’S SEXUAL ORIENTATION OR GENDER IDENTITY.
(2) “CONVERSION THERAPY” INCLUDES ANY EFFORT TO CHANGE THE
BEHAVIORAL EXPRESSION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S SEXUAL ORIENTATION, CHANGE
GENDER EXPRESSION, OR ELIMINATE OR REDUCE SEXUAL OR ROMANTIC
ATTRACTIONS OR FEELINGS TOWARD INDIVIDUALS OF THE SAME GENDER.
(3) “CONVERSION THERAPY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PRACTICE BY A
MENTAL HEALTH OR CHILD CARE PRACTITIONER THAT:
(I) PROVIDES ACCEPTANCE, SUPPORT, AND UNDERSTANDING,
OR THE FACILITATION OF COPING, SOCIAL SUPPORT, AND IDENTITY EXPLORATION
AND DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING SEXUAL ORIENTATION–NEUTRAL INTERVENTIONS
TO PREVENT OR ADDRESS UNLAWFUL CONDUCT OR UNSAFE SEXUAL PRACTICES;
AND
(II) DOES NOT SEEK TO CHANGE SEXUAL ORIENTATION OR
GENDER IDENTITY.
(B) AN INSURER THAT ISSUES TO, DELIVERS TO, OR RENEWS MEDICAL
PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY INSURANCE FOR A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER
LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY LAW TO PRACTICE IN THE
STATE SHALL IMPOSE A 35% SURCHARGE ON THE PREMIUMS CHARGED TO A
HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER THAT PRACTICES CONVERSION THERAPY IN THE
STATE.
(C) THE REVENUES FROM THE SURCHARGE IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE CONVERSION THERAPY
SURCHARGE FUND, UNDER § 19–119 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1209 15
19–119.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE CONVERSION THERAPY
SURCHARGE FUND.
(B) THERE IS A CONVERSION THERAPY SURCHARGE FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO REIMBURSE A PLAINTIFF THAT
SUCCESSFULLY RECOVERS DAMAGES FROM A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER FOR
HEALTH CARE MALPRACTICE AS A RESULT OF CONVERSION THERAPY UNDER TITLE
3, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE COURTS ARTICLE.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND FROM REVENUES
GENERATED FROM THE SURCHARGE IMPOSED UNDER § 19–118 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR REIMBURSING A SUCCESSFUL
PLAINTIFF IN AN ACTION AGAINST A PROVIDER FOR HEALTH CARE MALPRACTICE
ARISING FROM CONVERSION THERAPY UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE
COURTS ARTICLE FOR COSTS INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF AS A RESULT OF
RECEIVING CONVERSION THERAPY.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 1209
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.